Alaska statutes. Title 10. Corporations and Associations.
Article 7. Miscellaneous Provisions.

Sec. 10.55.701.
Consistency of application.

In applying and construing this chapter, consideration shall be given to the need to promote consistency of the law with respect to its subject matter among states that enact it.

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)

Sec. 10.55.702.
Relation to Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act.

This chapter modifies, limits, and supersedes 15 U.S.C. 7001 — 7031 (Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act), but does not modify, limit, or supersede 15 U.S.C. 7001(c), or authorize electronic delivery of any of the notices described in 15 U.S.C. 7003(b).

History.

(§ 10 ch 60 SLA 2013)